New York, session 2025-2026, S10536.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (mm) of subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the 2 social services law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (iii) to 3 read as follows: 4 (iii) The department shall regularly update the fee schedule for 5 services under this paragraph including, but not limited to, appropriate 6 current procedural terminology and proprietary laboratory analysis codes 7 and establish pricing for testing under this paragraph. 8 § 2. Within 60 days of the effective date of this act, the department 9 of health shall update the fee schedule for services under paragraph 10 (mm) of subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the social services law, 11 including, but not limited to, appropriate current procedural terminol- 12 ogy and proprietary laboratory analysis codes and shall establish pric- 13 ing for such any such coverage not included in such fee schedule. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15823-01-6